Hawaii statutes.
§195D-31 Trust fund. (a) There is
established within the state treasury a trust fund to be known as the
endangered species trust fund to be administered by the department to implement
the purposes of this chapter.

The fund shall consist of moneys from the
following sources:

(1) Moneys accrued from the sale of retail items
officially sponsored by the department for the fund;

(2) Private contributions for the management and
recovery of Hawaii's unique plants and animals;

(3) Fees and assessments charged for the commercial
use of public land and waters and designated for the fund;

(4) Penalties, fines, or auctions resulting from
enforcement violations;

(5) Legislative appropriations; and

(6) Moneys deposited to implement the obligations of
a habitat conservation plan, as security for habitat conservation plan funding,
or technical assistance program fees and payment for costs incurred for use of
the technical assistance program as set forth in section 195D-23(d).

(b) The fund shall be held separate and apart
from all other moneys, funds, and accounts in the state treasury; provided that
moneys received as deposits or contributions from private sources shall be
deposited and accounted for in accordance with the conditions established by
the agencies or persons making the contribution. Earnings on the investment of
the assets of the fund shall become a part of the fund. Any balance in the
fund at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal
year. [L 1997, c 380, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 144, §3; am L 2011, c 147, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next